Massachusetts, session 194th, S2577.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 385 of the acts of 1991 is hereby amended by the text “not exceed
fifty dollars” and replacing the same with the following:- “not exceed one hundred and fifty
dollars”.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
Provided that the General Court may reasonably vary the form and substance of the
requested legislation with the scope of the general public objectives of this petition; or take any
other action relative thereto.
of 1